Alaska statutes. Title 44. State Government.
Article 3. Certain Federal Highway Programs.

Sec. 44.42.300.
Participation in certain federal highway programs.

The department may

assume responsibilities under 23 U.S.C. 325 — 327, including

the filing of applications with the United States Department of Transportation under 23 U.S.C. 325(c)(1) and 23 U.S.C. 327(b)(2); and

taking those actions necessary to meet the application requirements established under 23 U.S.C. 325(c)(3) and 23 U.S.C. 327(b)(4);

enter one or more memoranda of understanding with the United States Department of Transportation related to federal highway programs as provided in 23 U.S.C. 325 — 327;

accept, receive, and administer grants, other money, or gifts from public and private agencies, including the federal government, for the purpose of carrying out the programs authorized under this section; and

cooperate with the federal government in implementing this section and any memorandum of understanding entered into under this section.

Notwithstanding any contrary provisions of law, in implementing a program under this section that is approved by the United States Department of Transportation, the department is authorized to

perform or conduct any of the activities described in any memorandum entered into under 23 U.S.C. 325, 23 U.S.C. 326, or 23 U.S.C. 327;

take actions necessary to implement the program; and

adopt relevant federal environmental standards as the standards for this state for the programs described in (a) of this section.

The department may adopt regulations under AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act) to carry out this section.

Except for actions alleging independent negligence by the state or its employees, an action may not be brought against the state or employees of the state for a claim arising out of design, operations, maintenance, or construction activities performed by, or under the management of, federally recognized tribes in Alaska acting in furtherance of the Indian Reservation Roads Program under 25 C.F.R. 170 or the Indian Reservation Roads Bridge Program under 23 U.S.C. 202, and the program or relevant state-tribal agreement requires compliance with all applicable federal and state standards. In this subsection, “independent negligence” means negligence that is not due to the state’s selection, supervision, administration, monitoring, or controlling of the activities of the tribe, the tribe’s agents, employees, or contractors, or the state’s approving or accepting any of the work performed under programs listed in this subsection.

History.

(§ 2 ch 50 SLA 2006; am § 1 ch 38 SLA 2009)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2009 amendment, effective June 21, 2009, added (d).

Editor’s notes. —

Under § 2, ch. 38, SLA 2009, subsection (d) of this section applies to claims arising on or after June 21, 2009.

Legislative history reports. —

For governor’s transmittal letter for ch. 50, SLA 2006 (SB 271), authorizing the Department of Transportation and Public Facilities to assume certain federal program and environmental responsibilities as provided for in the Safe, Accountable, Flexible, Efficient Transportation Equity Act:
A Legacy for Users (SAFETEA-LU), P.L. 109-59, and relating to waiver of immunity from suit in federal court as to those programs, see 2006 Senate Journal 2102 — 2103.